Utah statutes.
31A-22-419.   Insurer's purchase of and loans on policies.
Any life insurer may purchase for its own benefit any policy of insurance or
other obligation of the company and any claim of its policyholders.  The
insurer may also lend to the holders of policies of the company a sum which
does not exceed the sum of the cash value of the policies and the surplus or
dividend additions to the policies.  The policies and all additions to them
shall be security for payment of the loan.  An insurer's security interest in
a policy under this section need not be filed under Title 70A, Chapter 9a,
Uniform Commercial Code -- Secured Transactions, to be perfected.
